Wisconsin, session 2025, SB461.
do enact as follows:SB461,11Section 1. 84.01 (33) (bm) of the statutes is repealed.SB461,22Section 2. 84.013 (2m) of the statutes is amended to read:SB461,2,13384.013 (2m) The department shall annually adjust the amounts specified in 4sub. (1) (a) 1m. and 2m. to reflect the annual change in the Wisconsin Department 5of Transportation Price Construction Cost Index, Yearly Moving Average, as 6maintained by the department or, if at any time the department no longer 7maintains this index, another suitable index as determined by the department. 8Beginning in 2012, prior to October 1 of each year, the department shall compute 9the annual adjustment required under this subsection and shall publish the new 10adjusted amount applicable under sub. (1) (a) 1m. and 2m., which amount shall 11become effective on October 1 of that year. The department may not adjust the 12amounts specified in sub. (1) (a) 1m. and 2m. to an amount less than that specified 13in sub. (1) (a) 1m. and 2m.SB461,314Section 3. 84.0145 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:SB461,3,51584.0145 (4) The department shall annually adjust the amount specified in 16sub. (1) (c) to reflect the annual change in the Wisconsin Department of 17Transportation Price Construction Cost Index, Yearly Moving Average, as 18maintained by the department or, if at any time the department no longer 19maintains this index, another suitable index as determined by the department. 1Beginning in 2012, prior to October 1 of each year, the department shall compute 2the annual adjustment required under this subsection and shall publish the new 3adjusted amount applicable under sub. (1) (c), which amount shall become effective 4on October 1 of that year. The department may not adjust the amount specified in 5sub. (1) (c) to an amount less than that specified in sub. (1) (c).SB461,46Section 4. 84.062 (1) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 84.062 (1) (am) and 7amended to read:SB461,3,12884.062 (1) (am) “Alternative technical concepts” concept” means a proposed 9alternative to the technical requirements provided by the office a suggested change 10to the project requirements submitted by a qualified responsible bidder or proposer 11that modifies the department's supplied basic configurations or design or 12construction criteria in the request for proposals for a project.SB461,513Section 5. 84.062 (1) (ae) of the statutes is created to read:SB461,3,161484.062 (1) (ae) “Alternative project delivery” means any construction project 15delivery method, other than under s. 84.06 (2), that is eligible for federal funding 16under title 23 of the code of federal regulations.SB461,617Section 6. 84.062 (1) (b) of the statutes is repealed.SB461,718Section 7. 84.062 (1) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:SB461,3,221984.062 (1) (bm) “Construction manager-general contractor delivery” is the 20delivery of a project through a two-phase contract under which a contractor 21provides services during the preconstruction phase and, if there is an agreed upon 22price and scope, the construction phase of a project.SB461,823Section 8. 84.062 (1) (c) of the statutes is repealed.SB461,924Section 9. 84.062 (1) (d) of the statutes is repealed.SB461,101Section 10. 84.062 (1) (dm) of the statutes is repealed.SB461,112Section 11. 84.062 (1) (er) of the statutes is created to read:SB461,4,6384.062 (1) (er) “Progressive design-build method” means a two-phase 4contract, including a qualification-based selection process after which the 5department and a contractor work together to develop the final scope, schedule, and 6budget for a project.SB461,127Section 12. 84.062 (1) (h), (i), (j) and (k) of the statutes are repealed.SB461,138Section 13. 84.062 (1) (L) of the statutes is amended to read:SB461,4,10984.062 (1) (L) “Project” means a project involving a highway improvement, as 10defined in s. 84.063 (1) (d) state trunk highway improvement project.SB461,1411Section 14. 84.062 (1) (Lm) of the statutes is created to read:SB461,4,131284.062 (1) (Lm) "Proposer" means an entity, joint venture, or consortium that 13submits a proposal in a single-phase selection process under sub. (4) (c).SB461,1514Section 15. 84.062 (1) (m) of the statutes is amended to read:SB461,4,181584.062 (1) (m) “Qualified responsible bidder” means a design-builder that is 16responding to a request for qualifications and that is certified respondent 17determined by the technical review committee to be a qualified responsible bidder 18under sub. (3) (cm) 1.SB461,1619Section 16. 84.062 (1) (mn) of the statutes is created to read:SB461,4,212084.062 (1) (mn) “Respondent” means an entity, joint venture, or consortium 21that submits a response to a request for qualifications. SB461,1722Section 17. 84.062 (1) (n), (o) and (q) of the statutes are repealed.SB461,1823Section 18. 84.062 (2) (title) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:SB461,4,242484.062 (2) (title) Projects.SB461,191Section 19. 84.062 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB461,5,7284.062 (2) (a) The Notwithstanding s. 84.06 (2), the department shall 3administer a pilot program under which not more than 6 contracts are awarded 4may award contracts under this section for design-build projects that will use 5alternative project delivery. The department may not award contracts under this 6section for projects using construction manager-general contractor delivery or 7progressive design-build methods.SB461,208Section 20. 84.062 (2) (b) of the statutes is repealed.SB461,219Section 21. 84.062 (2) (c) of the statutes is created to read:SB461,5,121084.062 (2) (c) 1. Subject to subds. 2. to 4., the department may encumber in 11each fiscal biennium an amount not to exceed $300,000,000 for projects using 12alternative project delivery.SB461,5,15132. In a joint project between states, the amounts that the department pays or 14commits to the other state, and the amounts paid or committed to this state by the 15other state, may not be counted under subd. 1.SB461,5,20163. The amount that is encumbered in a fiscal biennium under subd. 1. does 17not limit the amount that may be encumbered under subd. 1. in subsequent fiscal 18biennia. The amount that is not encumbered in a fiscal biennium under subd. 1. 19may not be carried forward to increase the total amount that may be encumbered 20under subd. 1. in subsequent fiscal biennia.SB461,6,5214. The department shall annually adjust the amount specified in subd. 1. to 22reflect the annual change in the Wisconsin Department of Transportation 23Construction Cost Index, Yearly Moving Average, as maintained by the department 24or, if at any time the department no longer maintains this index, another suitable 1index as determined by the department. Beginning in 2026, prior to October 1 of 2each year, the department shall compute the annual adjustment required under 3this subdivision and shall publish the new adjusted amount applicable under subd. 41., which amount shall become effective on October 1 of that year. The department 5may not adjust the amount specified in subd. 1. to a lower amount. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb461 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb461 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB461 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB461 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB461: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting